index.aff
FLAG long					
SFX	D4	Y	6		
SFX	D4		търъ	търъ	.
SFX	D4		търъ	търа	.
SFX	D4		търъ	търътъ	.
SFX	D4		търъ	трове	.
SFX	D4		търъ	троветѣ	.
SFX	D4		търъ	тре	.
					
SFX	D5	Y	9		
SFX	D5		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	D5		ъ	а	.
SFX	D5		ъ	ътъ	.
SFX	D5		ъ	ове	.
SFX	D5		ъ	оветѣ	.
SFX	D5		ъ	е	[^гкх]е
SFX	D5		гъ	же	.
SFX	D5		къ	че	.
SFX	D5		хъ	ше	.
					
SFX	D6	Y	15		
SFX	D6		ръхъ	ръхъ	.
SFX	D6		ръхъ	ърха	.
SFX	D6		ръхъ	ърхътъ	.
SFX	D6		ръхъ	ърхове	.
SFX	D6		ръхъ	ърховетѣ	.
SFX	D6		ръбъ	ръбъ	.
SFX	D6		ръбъ	ърба	.
SFX	D6		ръбъ	ърбътъ	.
SFX	D6		ръбъ	ърбове	.
SFX	D6		ръбъ	ърбоветѣ	.
SFX	D6		ръмъ	ръмъ	.
SFX	D6		ръмъ	ърма	.
SFX	D6		ръмъ	ърмътъ	.
SFX	D6		ръмъ	ърмове	.
SFX	D6		ръмъ	ърмоветѣ	.
					
SFX	D7	Y	5		
SFX	D7		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	D7		ъ	а	.
SFX	D7		ъ	ътъ	.
SFX	D7		ъ	илища	.
SFX	D7		ъ	илищата	.
					
SFX	D8	Y	10		
SFX	D8		й	йо	.
SFX	D8		й	йко	.
SFX	D8		ь	ьо	.
SFX	D8		ь	ко	.
SFX	D8		гъ	гъ	.
SFX	D8		гъ	га	.
SFX	D8		гъ	гътъ	.
SFX	D8		гъ	зи	.
SFX	D8		гъ	зитѣ	.
SFX	D8		гъ	же	.
					
SFX	D9	Y	6		
SFX	D9		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	D9		ъ	а	.
SFX	D9		ъ	ътъ	.
SFX	D9		ъ	и	.
SFX	D9		ъ	итѣ	.
SFX	D9		ъ	е	.
					
SFX	E0	Y	6		
SFX	E0		ь	ь	.
SFX	E0		ь	я	.
SFX	E0		ь	ьтъ	.
SFX	E0		ь	и	.
SFX	E0		ь	итѣ	.
SFX	E0		ь	ю	.
					
SFX	E1	Y	13		
SFX	E1		ь	ь	.
SFX	E1		ь	я	.
SFX	E1		ь	ьтъ	.
SFX	E1		ь	е	.
SFX	E1		ь	етѣ	.
SFX	E1		ь	ю	.
SFX	E1		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	E1		ъ	а	.
SFX	E1		ъ	ътъ	.
SFX	E1		ъ	е	.
SFX	E1		ъ	етѣ	.
SFX	E1		зъ	же	.
SFX	E1		жъ	жо	.
					
SFX	E2	Y	16		
SFX	E2		день	день	.
SFX	E2		день	деня	.
SFX	E2		день	деньтъ	.
SFX	E2		день	дена	.
SFX	E2		день	дни	.
SFX	E2		день	днитѣ	.
SFX	E2		огънь	огънь	.
SFX	E2		огънь	огъня	.
SFX	E2		огънь	огъньтъ	.
SFX	E2		огънь	огньове	.
SFX	E2		огънь	огньоветѣ	.
SFX	E2		къть	къть	.
SFX	E2		къть	кътя	.
SFX	E2		къть	кътьтъ	.
SFX	E2		къть	кти	.
SFX	E2		къть	ктитѣ	.
					
SFX	E3	Y	7		
SFX	E3		ь	ь	.
SFX	E3		ь	я	.
SFX	E3		ь	ьтъ	.
SFX	E3		ь	и	.
SFX	E3		ь	итѣ	.
SFX	E3		ь	е	.
SFX	E3		ь	ю	.
					
SFX	F0	Y	13		
SFX	F0		а	а	.
SFX	F0		а	ата	.
SFX	F0		а	и	.
SFX	F0		а	итѣ	.
SFX	F0		а	о	.
SFX	F0		а	е	[^аеиоуъьюяѣѫ]ка
SFX	F0		а	е	[ий]ца
SFX	F0		я	я	.
SFX	F0		я	ята	.
SFX	F0		я	и	.
SFX	F0		я	итѣ	.
SFX	F0		я	йо	[аеийоуъьюяѣѫ]я
SFX	F0		я	ьо	[^аеийоуъьюяѣѫ]я
					
SFX	F1	Y	20		
SFX	F1		ца	ца	.
SFX	F1		ца	цата	.
SFX	F1		ца	це	.
SFX	F1		ца	цетѣ	.
SFX	F1		ца	цо	.
SFX	F1		ня	ня	.
SFX	F1		ня	нята	.
SFX	F1		ня	не	.
SFX	F1		ня	нетѣ	.
SFX	F1		ня	ньо	.
SFX	F1		ка	ка	.
SFX	F1		ка	ката	.
SFX	F1		ка	цѣ	.
SFX	F1		ка	цѣтѣ	.
SFX	F1		ка	ко	.
SFX	F1		га	га	.
SFX	F1		га	гата	.
SFX	F1		га	зѣ	.
SFX	F1		га	зѣтѣ	.
SFX	F1		га	го	.
					
SFX	F2	Y	12		
SFX	F2		а	ка/F0	[бвдлрстш]а
SFX	F2		а	чица/F0	[бвдлрстш]а
SFX	F2		а	ка/F0	[мнпфч]а
SFX	F2		га	жка/F0	.
SFX	F2		га	жчица/F0	.
SFX	F2		ка	чица/F0	.
SFX	F2		ца	чка/F0	.
SFX	F2		ха	шка/F0	.
SFX	F2		ха	шчица/F0	.
SFX	F2		я	йка/F0	[аеиоу]я
SFX	F2		я	ка/F0	[л]я
SFX	F2		я	чица/F0	[л]я
					
SFX	F3	Y	10		
SFX	F3		а	ица/F0	[бвгджзклмнпрстфхшщ]а
SFX	F3		а	ичка/F0	[бвгджзклмнпрстфхшщ]а
SFX	F3		ца	чица/F0	.
SFX	F3		ца	чичка/F0	.
SFX	F3		ча	чица/F0	.
SFX	F3		ча	чичка/F0	.
SFX	F3		ь	ица/F0	.
SFX	F3		ь	ичка/F0	.
SFX	F3		я	ица/F0	[абдлмнео]я
SFX	F3		я	ичка/F0	[абдлмнео]я
					
SFX	F4	Y	7		
SFX	F4		ень	ничка/F0	.
SFX	F4		ка	чка/F0	[^ч]ка
SFX	F4		ка	ица/F0	[ч]ка
SFX	F4		ха	шица/F0	.
SFX	F4		ха	шичка/F0	.
SFX	F4		ца	цка/F0	.
SFX	F4		ъль	личка/F0	.
					
SFX	F5	Y	5		
SFX	F5		й	чица/F0	.
SFX	F5		ка	чица/F0	.
SFX	F5		ка	чичка/F0	.
SFX	F5		на	нчица/F0	.
SFX	F5		ь	чица/F0	.
					
SFX	F6	Y	7		
SFX	F6		ла	лца/B2	.
SFX	F6		ра	рица/B2	.
SFX	F6		та	тки/B2	.
SFX	F6		ти	тки/B2	.
SFX	F6		ща	щенца/B2	.
SFX	F6		ща	щета/B2	.
SFX	F6		щи	щички/B2	.
					
SFX	F7	Y	13		
SFX	F7		й	йче/J0	.
SFX	F7		й	йченце/J3	.
SFX	F7		е	енце/J3	.
SFX	F7		и	инце/J3	.
SFX	F7		о	енце/J3	.
SFX	F7		ърво	ръвце/J3	.
SFX	F7		ълво	лъбце/J3	.
SFX	F7		ъ	е/J0	чъ
SFX	F7		ъ	енце/J3	чъ
SFX	F7		ъ	че/J0	[^ч]ъ
SFX	F7		ъ	ченце/J3	[^ч]ъ
SFX	F7		ь	че/J0	.
SFX	F7		ь	ченце/J3	.
					
SFX	F8	Y	32		
SFX	F8		бло	бълце/J3	.
SFX	F8		бро	бърце/J3	.
SFX	F8		гло	гълце/J3	.
SFX	F8		гне	гънце/J3	.
SFX	F8		динъ	динчо/J8	.
SFX	F8		дло	делче/J0	.
SFX	F8		дро	дърце/J3	.
SFX	F8		ене	енце/J3	.
SFX	F8		елъ	ле/J0	.
SFX	F8		елъ	ленце/J3	.
SFX	F8		жъ	жле/J0	.
SFX	F8		жъ	жленце/J3	.
SFX	F8		кло	кълце/J3	.
SFX	F8		кно	кънце/J3	.
SFX	F8		ко	че/J0	.
SFX	F8		ко	ченце/J3	.
SFX	F8		къ	че/J0	.
SFX	F8		къ	ченце/J3	.
SFX	F8		сло	сълце/J3	.
SFX	F8		смо	съмце/J3	.
SFX	F8		тно	тънце/J3	.
SFX	F8		тъ	тле/J0	.
SFX	F8		тъ	тленце/J3	.
SFX	F8		хо	ше/J0	.
SFX	F8		хо	шенце/J3	.
SFX	F8		чъ	чле/J0	.
SFX	F8		чъ	членце/J3	.
SFX	F8		шно	шънце/J3	.
SFX	F8		ърво	ръвче/J0	.
SFX	F8		ърво	ръвченце/J3	.
SFX	F8		ерво	ревце/J3	.
SFX	F8		ърно	рънце/J3	.
					
SFX	F9	Y	15		
SFX	F9		екъ	йче/J0	[аеоиуяѣ]екъ
SFX	F9		екъ	йченце/J3	[аеоиуяѣ]екъ
SFX	F9		ецъ	че/J0	[^аеоиуяѣ]ецъ
SFX	F9		ецъ	ченце/J3	[^аеоиуяѣ]ецъ
SFX	F9		ецъ	йче/J0	[аеоиуяѣ]ецъ
SFX	F9		ецъ	йченце/J3	[аеоиуяѣ]ецъ
SFX	F9		ие	ийце/J3	.
SFX	F9		инъ	че/J0	[^аеоиуяѣ]инъ
SFX	F9		инъ	йче/J0	[аеоиуяѣ]инъ
SFX	F9		ио	ийце/J3	.
SFX	F9		ия	ийче/J0	.
SFX	F9		ко	кце/J3	.
SFX	F9		ко	чице/J3	.
SFX	F9		о	це/J3	[^ик]о
SFX	F9		це	чице/J3	.
					
SFX	G0	Y	6		
SFX	G0		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	G0		ъ	а	.
SFX	G0		ъ	ътъ	.
SFX	G0		ъ	и	.
SFX	G0		ъ	итѣ	.
SFX	G0		ъ	о	.
					
SFX	H0	Y	50		
SFX	H0		азъ	азъ	.
SFX	H0		азъ	менъ	.
SFX	H0		азъ	мене	.
SFX	H0		азъ	ме	.
SFX	H0		азъ	менъ	.
SFX	H0		азъ	мене	.
SFX	H0		азъ	ми	.
SFX	H0		ти	ти	.
SFX	H0		ти	тебъ	.
SFX	H0		ти	тебе	.
SFX	H0		ти	те	.
SFX	H0		ти	тебъ	.
SFX	H0		ти	тебе	.
SFX	H0		ти	ти	.
SFX	H0		той	той	.
SFX	H0		той	него	.
SFX	H0		той	го	.
SFX	H0		той	нему	.
SFX	H0		той	него	.
SFX	H0		той	му	.
SFX	H0		тя	тя	.
SFX	H0		тя	нея	.
SFX	H0		тя	я	.
SFX	H0		тя	ней	.
SFX	H0		тя	нея	.
SFX	H0		тя	ѝ	.
SFX	H0		то	то	.
SFX	H0		то	него	.
SFX	H0		то	го	.
SFX	H0		то	нему	.
SFX	H0		то	него	.
SFX	H0		то	му	.
SFX	H0		ние	ние	.
SFX	H0		ние	насъ	.
SFX	H0		ние	ни	.
SFX	H0		ние	намъ	.
SFX	H0		ние	насъ	.
SFX	H0		ние	ни	.
SFX	H0		вие	вие	.
SFX	H0		вие	васъ	.
SFX	H0		вие	ви	.
SFX	H0		вие	вамъ	.
SFX	H0		вие	васъ	.
SFX	H0		вие	ви	.
SFX	H0		тѣ	тѣ	.
SFX	H0		тѣ	тѣхъ	.
SFX	H0		тѣ	ги	.
SFX	H0		тѣ	тѣмъ	.
SFX	H0		тѣ	тѣхъ	.
SFX	H0		тѣ	имъ	.
					
SFX	H1	Y	32		
SFX	H1		този	този	.
SFX	H1		този	тази	.
SFX	H1		този	това	.
SFX	H1		този	тѣзи	.
SFX	H1		тозъ	тозъ	.
SFX	H1		тозъ	тазъ	.
SFX	H1		тозъ	това	.
SFX	H1		тозъ	тѣзъ	.
SFX	H1		онзи	онзи	.
SFX	H1		онзи	онази	.
SFX	H1		онзи	оназъ	.
SFX	H1		онзи	онова	.
SFX	H1		онзи	онѣзи	.
SFX	H1		онзи	онѣзъ	.
SFX	H1		тоя	тоя	.
SFX	H1		тоя	тая	.
SFX	H1		тоя	туй	.
SFX	H1		тоя	тия	.
SFX	H1		оня	оня	.
SFX	H1		оня	оная	.
SFX	H1		оня	онуй	.
SFX	H1		оня	ония	.
SFX	H1		такъвъ	такъвъ	.
SFX	H1		такъвъ	такава	.
SFX	H1		такъвъ	такова	.
SFX	H1		такъвъ	такива	.
SFX	H1		онакъвъ	онакъвъ	.
SFX	H1		онакъвъ	онакава	.
SFX	H1		онакъвъ	онакова	.
SFX	H1		онакъвъ	онакива	.
SFX	H1		толкавъ	толкавъ/A0	.
SFX	H1		инакъвъ	инакъвъ/A4	.
					
SFX	H2	Y	25		
SFX	H2		мой	мой/A0	.
SFX	H2		мой	ми	.
SFX	H2		твой	твой/A0	.
SFX	H2		твой	ти	.
SFX	H2		свой	свой/A0	.
SFX	H2		свой	си	.
SFX	H2		неговъ	неговъ/A0	.
SFX	H2		неговъ	му	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	неинъ	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейния	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейниятъ	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейний	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейна	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейнана	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейно	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейното	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейни	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	нейнитѣ	.
SFX	H2		неинъ	ѝ	.
SFX	H2		нашъ	нашъ/A0	.
SFX	H2		нашъ	ни	.
SFX	H2		вашъ	вашъ/A0	.
SFX	H2		вашъ	ви	.
SFX	H2		тѣхенъ	тѣхенъ/A2	.
SFX	H2		тѣхенъ	имъ	.
					
SFX	H3	Y	19		
SFX	H3		кой	кой	.
SFX	H3		кой	кого	.
SFX	H3		кой	кому	.
SFX	H3		кой	кого	.
SFX	H3		кой	коя	.
SFX	H3		кой	кое	.
SFX	H3		кой	кои	.
SFX	H3		чий	чий	.
SFX	H3		чий	чия	.
SFX	H3		чий	чие	.
SFX	H3		чий	чии	.
SFX	H3		какъвъ	какъвъ	.
SFX	H3		какъвъ	каква	.
SFX	H3		какъвъ	какво	.
SFX	H3		какъвъ	какви	.
SFX	H3		колкавъ	колкавъ	.
SFX	H3		колкавъ	колкава	.
SFX	H3		колкавъ	колкаво	.
SFX	H3		колкавъ	колкави	.
					
