index.dic
азъ/H0
акрополъ/D9F7
антилопа/F0F2
антропологъ/D8F7
анфасъ/D9F7
арендаторъ/D9F7
армада/F0
арменецъ/F9L0
астрологъ/D8F7
атъ/D5
баджакъ/F8O0
барака/F0F4
бартеръ/D9F7
бездна/F0F3
бизнесклубъ/D0F7
билкарь/E0F7
биологъ/D8F7
биофизикъ/F8O0O2
бисквита/F0F2
бичъ/D5F8
благотворителка/F0
бодигардъ/D5F7
болшевикъ/F8G0
боляринъ/F9M0
бризъ/D5F7
брустъ/D9F7
бръчка/F0F4
бубина/F0F2F5
букволѣярь/E3F7
букъ/D5F7
бунтарь/E0F7
бюстъ/D5F7
бѣлова/F0F3
бѣлтъкъ/F8O0
варваринъ/F9M0
вашъ/H2
видеокасета/F0F2
видеоконтролеръ/D9F7
вие/H0
византологъ/D8F7
визитка/F0F2
викачъ/G0
вицекраль/E1F7
власть/B0F5
вододѣлъ/D9F7
волъ/D5F7
връхъ/D6F7
вуйна/F0F3
въздържатель/E0F7
вълшебникъ/F8O0O2
въорѫжение/F9L0
вършачъ/G0
вѣтъръ/D4F7
гаднярь/E3F7
галактика/F0F4
гардъ/D5
геоцентъръ/D4
глетчеръ/D9F7
гнилота/F0
гномъ/D5F7
гондолиеръ/D9F7
горчилка/F0F2
градина/F0F2F5
граничарь/E0F7
графологъ/D8F7
гребло/F8L0
гримьорна/F0F3
гроздоберачъ/G0
гроздъ/D5F7
гръбъ/D6F7
гръмовержецъ/F9L0
гръмъ/D6F7
деница/F0F2
деноминация/F0F2
день/E2
дерматологъ/D8F7
джинъ/D5F7
диезъ/D9F7
дискотека/F0F4
домъ/D5F7
доносникъ/F8O0
драматургъ/D8F7
дрязга/F0F3
дрѣмка/F0F2
духало/F9L0
духъ/D5F7
дъждомѣръ/D9F7
дъска/F0F3F5
евикция/F0F2
електропоялникъ/F8O0O2
ембриологъ/D8F7
емисарь/E0F7
емулгаторъ/D9F7
епицентъръ/D4
жардиниера/F0F2
желѣзолѣярь/E3F7
животописецъ/F9L0
забойна/F0F3
завеса/F0F2
загърлячъ/G0
заселникъ/F8O0O2
затъмнитель/E0F7
захарь/B0F5
звѣръ/D5F7
зеленика/F0F4
зигзагъ/D8F7
злато/F9L0
зѣпачъ/G0
изговоръ/D9F7
издръжка/F0F2
излетъ/D9F7
измамникъ/F8O0O2
изобличитель/E0F7
изпитвачъ/G0
изцѣлителка/F0
икона/F0F2F5
иманярь/E3F7
инакъвъ/H1
ипотека/F0F4
кадемлия/F9M0
кака/F0F3
какъвъ/H3
калиграфия/F0F2
камина/F0F2F5
капанъ/D9F7
кардиограма/F0F2
картотека/F0F4
касоразбивачъ/G0
касторъ/D9F7
киноцентъръ/D4F7
киселина/F0F2F5
китеникъ/F8O0
китоловецъ/F9L0
клетвонарушитель/E0F7
клечка/F0F4
клика/F0F3
клисура/F0F2
князъ/E1F7
ковчегъ/D8
козле/F7J0
кой/H3
колкавъ/H3
комедия/F0F2
контрафаготъ/D9F7
конь/E1F7
конярь/E3F7
копачъ/G0
корелация/F0F2
краль/E1F7
красноармеецъ/F9M2
кратуна/F0F2F5
кремъ/D0F7
крушарь/E0F7
кръстъ/D5F7
куверта/F0
кула/F0F3
кърпачъ/G0
лавина/F0F2F5
лакъть/E2F7
либиецъ/F9M2
лигатура/F0F2
логика/F0F4
лоза/F0F3
лунатичка/F0
лѣярь/E3F7
мавъръ/F7M0
магъ/D5
маджунъ/D9F7
маймуна/F0F2F5
маниакъ/F8O0O2
маслина/F0F2F5
мастика/F0F4
мелодия/F0F2
мента/F0F3
металолѣярь/E3F7
метеорологъ/D8F7
механизация/F0F2
мечкарь/E0F7
минохвъргачъ/G0
митрополитъ/D9F7
мишена/F0F2F5
мой/H2
монголецъ/F9L0
мултиплексъ/D9F7
мълния/F0F2
мъсть/B0F5
мѫжъ/E1F8
набирачъ/G0
набѣгъ/D8F7
надвластница/F0
наковалня/F0F3
нашийникъ/F8O0
нашъ/H2
неговъ/H2
неинъ/H2
ние/H0
нишесте/F7J0
нога/F1
нокъть/E2F7
носачъ/G0
носологъ/D8F7
нравоучитель/E0F7
обуща/B2F6
овца/F1F3
огнярь/E3F7
огънь/E2F7
онакъвъ/H1
онзи/H1
оня/H1
освѣтитель/E0F7
отговоръ/D9F7
отологъ/D8F7
очила/B2F6
падишахъ/F7O0
палавникъ/F8O0O2
палачъ/G0
палуба/F0F3
панаирджия/F9M0
папка/F0F2
парализа/F0
педагогика/F0F4
планетологъ/D8F7
плочарь/E0F7
плочка/F0F4
площадъ/D9F7
плѣвня/F0F3
повѣсть/B0F5
подковачъ/G0
полудень/E2
полупроводникъ/F8O0
помиярь/E3F7
попъ/D5F7
потрѣбитель/E0F7
праистория/F0F2
пращина/F0F2
пресцентъръ/D4F7
придружитель/E0F7
проба/F0F3
процесоръ/D9F7
прѣдвѣститель/E0F7
прѣдприемачъ/G0
прѣлесть/B0F5
прѣстолонаслѣдникъ/F8O0O2
прѣчка/F0F4
псалмопѣвецъ/F9L0
психологъ/D8F7
радиослушатель/E0F7
радиоцентъръ/D4F7
раздавачъ/G0
раса/F0F3
ратайкиня/F0
рекултвиция/F0F2
реплика/F0F4
рибовѫдъ/D9F7
рокамболъ/D9F7
рѫка/F1F5
рѫчка/F0F4
санитарь/E0F7
сановникъ/F8O0O2
саркофагъ/D8F7
сватъ/D5
свивачъ/G0
свиня/F1
свой/H2
свѣщолѣярь/E3F7
скандинавецъ/F9L0
слободия/F0F2
слонъ/D5F7
служба/F0F3
смърть/B0F5
спирачка/F0F4
статоскопъ/D9F7
стачкоизмѣнникъ/F8O0O2
стихия/F0F2
стоманолѣярь/E3F7
стругарь/E0F7
сугестологъ/D8F7
съвѣсть/B0F5
съселъ/F7M1
сѫдъ/D7F7
такъвъ/H1
тамбура/F0F3
танцувачъ/G0
твой/H2
твърдоглавецъ/F9L0
телецентъръ/D4F7
терминология/F0F2
техника/F0F4
ти/H0
то/H0
този/H1
тозъ/H1
той/H0
токоприемникъ/F8O0
токоразпрѣдѣлитель/E0F7
толкавъ/H1
тормозъ/D9F7
тоя/H1
тръстика/F0F4
тя/H0
тѣ/H0
тѣхенъ/H2
увертюра/F0F2
учредитель/E0F7
филологъ/D8F7
фитопатологъ/D8F7
фльонга/F0F3
фонотека/F0F4
фронтонъ/D9F7
фъшкия/F0F2
хоро/F9L0
хронологъ/D8F7
хубость/B0F5
царь/E1F7
центъръ/D4F7
цинкография/F0F2
цица/XXF0F4
чайникъ/F8O0
чий/H3
шмайзеръ/D9F7
шпора/F0F3
шутъ/D5F7
юбилярь/E3F7
югославянинъ/F9M0
юрисконсултъ/D9F7
